Massachusetts, session 194th, S2435.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 22 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (j) the following new subsection:-
(k) Temporary Restoration for Individuals Returning from Incarceration
(1) The registrar shall temporarily restore the driver’s license or right to operate of any
individual returning from incarceration upon application, provided that:
The individual was previously licensed under this chapter.
The individual enters into a payment agreement to pay down any outstanding fees, fines,
or civil penalties owed to the Registry of Motor Vehicles in regular installments, as determined
by the registrar.
(2) Such restored licenses shall remain valid only so long as the individual complies with
the terms of the payment agreement. If the individual fails to make required payments, the
of 2

registrar may revoke the license following a written notice and opportunity to cure the payment
default within thirty days.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the registrar from revoking or suspending a
restored license for reasons unrelated to the payment agreement, as provided elsewhere in this
chapter.
(4) The registrar shall promulgate regulations to implement this subsection, including
eligibility criteria, installment payment schedules, and procedures for reinstating licenses after
default.
of 2